Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1018.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the mRNA Vaccine Choice Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Adult." An individual 18 years of age or older."Child." An individual under 18 years of age."Entity." A governmental authority, Commonwealth agency, health care facility, employer, school or private business that operates in this Commonwealth."Health care provider." A person or entity licensed, 12345678910111213141516171819 certified or otherwise authorized under the laws of this Commonwealth to administer vaccines."mRNA vaccine." A vaccine that uses messenger ribonucleic acid technology to elicit an immune response, including vaccines for COVID-19, influenza or other infectious diseases.Section 3. Voluntary mRNA vaccine requirement.(a) Children.--(1) An entity may not require a child to receive an mRNA vaccine, except that the child's legal guardian may voluntarily consent to the child's receipt of an mRNA vaccine with the acknowledgment required under section 4(b).(2) The provisions of this subsection shall be construed to supplement 28 Pa. Code Ch. 23 Subch. C (relating to immunization). Notwithstanding 28 Pa. Code § 23.83 (relating to immunization requirements), the following shall apply:(i) The Department of Health may not add an mRNA vaccine to the list of immunizations required for school attendance in this Commonwealth.(ii) A school director, superintendent, principal or other person in charge of a public, private, parochial or nonpublic school in this Commonwealth, including an area career and technical school, intermediate unit, special education or home education program, charter school or cyber charter school, may not require a child to receive an mRNA vaccine as a condition of admission or attendance.(b) Adults.--An entity may not require an adult to receive an mRNA vaccine, except that an adult may voluntarily consent to receive an mRNA vaccine with the acknowledgment required under section 4(b).20250SB1018PN1262 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. Waivers and informed consent.(a) Refusal waiver.--If an entity requests that an individual receive an mRNA vaccine and the individual, or in the case of a child, the child's legal guardian, refuses, the individual or legal guardian shall execute a written waiver releasing the entity from liability if the individual subsequently contracts the disease the vaccine is intended to prevent.(b) Consent acknowledgment.--An individual, or in the case of a child, the child's legal guardian, who voluntarily chooses to receive an mRNA vaccine shall execute a written acknowledgment that:(1) a health care provider fully explained the potential side effects of the vaccine; and(2) the individual or legal guardian and the administering health care provider signed documentation attesting to the explanation.(c) Recordkeeping.--A health care provider who administers or offers an mRNA vaccine shall retain a copy of each waiver or acknowledgment executed under this section in paper and electronic form for not less than 10 years. Records under this subsection shall be retained in accordance with the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191, 110 Stat. 1936) and other applicable privacy laws and shall be limited to executed refusal waivers and informed-consent acknowledgments.Section 5. Employer and entity penalties.(a) Private entities.--A private entity that terminates an individual's employment because the individual refused to receive an mRNA vaccine shall:20250SB1018PN1262 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) pay a civil penalty in an amount not less than $10,000 and not more than $50,000, based on whether the violation is a first or repeated offense, payable to the individual; and(2) immediately rehire the individual with full back pay or, at the election of the individual, pay a lump sum equal to lost wages and benefits plus liquidated damages.(b) Commonwealth agencies and health care facilities.--(1) A Commonwealth agency or State-operated health care facility that suspends, discharges or terminates an individual because the individual refused to receive an mRNA vaccine shall immediately reinstate the individual with full back pay.(2) A private, for-profit health care facility that suspends, discharges or terminates an individual because the individual refused to receive an mRNA vaccine shall immediately reinstate the individual with full back pay, or a lump sum equal to lost wages and benefits plus liquidated damages, and shall also be subject to the civil penalty under subsection (a)(1).Section 6. Pennsylvania National Guard requirements.(a) State authority.--A member of the Pennsylvania National Guard who is employed by the Commonwealth or ordered to State active duty under State authority under 51 Pa.C.S. (relating to military affairs) and who is suspended, discharged or terminated solely for refusing an mRNA vaccine shall be reinstated to the member's prior Commonwealth employment status or military rank, as applicable. This subsection shall only apply to service under 32 U.S.C. (relating to National Guard) or State active duty and shall not apply to service under 10 U.S.C. (relating to Armed 20250SB1018PN1262 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Forces).(b) Back pay.--A member of the Pennsylvania National Guard who is reinstated under subsection (a) shall receive full back pay and benefits attributable to Commonwealth employment from the date of suspension, discharge or termination until reinstatement. Back pay under this subsection shall apply only to wages, allowances or benefits payable under State authority and does not include any Federal military pay or benefits.(c) Limitations.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to:(1) override Federal law, Federal vaccination requirements or duties performed under Federal authority; or(2) limit the authority of the Federal Government to enforce federally mandated vaccinations for federally recognized duty or training periods.Section 7. Enforcement.(a) Administrative complaints.--(1) A person aggrieved under this act may file a complaint with any of the following:(i) The Department of Health for matters involving health care facilities or health care providers.(ii) The Office of Administration for matters involving Commonwealth employment practices.(iii) A local agency as defined under 2 Pa.C.S. § 101 (relating to definitions) for matters involving the local agency.(2) Each complaint under paragraph (1) shall be processed as an agency proceeding culminating in adjudication as defined in 2 Pa.C.S. § 101.(b) Agency procedure.--Adjudications issued under subsection 20250SB1018PN1262 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a)(1)(i) or (ii) shall be subject to the practice and procedure provisions of 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies) and 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action). Adjudications under subsection (a)(1)(iii) shall proceed in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5 Subch. B (relating to practice and procedure of local agencies) and 7 Subch. B (relating to judicial review of local agency action).(c) Remedies and fees.--An entity found in violation of this act shall:(1) comply with the reinstatement, back pay and penalty provisions of section 5 or 6; and(2) be liable for the reasonable attorney fees incurred by the aggrieved party.(d) Civil action.--In addition to enforcement under this section, an individual aggrieved under this act may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction for reinstatement, back pay, penalties and attorney fees as specified under this act.Section 8. Federal savings clause.Nothing in this act shall be construed to supersede Federal law or a federally mandated vaccination requirement in a federally regulated sector, including Federal military service, interstate commerce or conditions of Federal funding.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB1018PN1262 - 6 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526